Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1550.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; state treasurer; Queen Creek police department; specialized law enforcement pilot program; exemption A. The sum of $1,255,500 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the state treasurer for distribution to the town of Queen Creek for the Queen Creek police department to establish a three-year pilot program for specialized law enforcement. The specialized law enforcement pilot program shall focus on the following: 1. Prevention of incidents of runaway youth. 2. Protection of at-risk youth from exploitation. 3. Enhancement of the investigative capability of the police department. 4. Strengthening collaboration with care providers and state agencies. 5. Production of a model framework for statewide replication. B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.